Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1729XC (4) 91 nls/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 533C.1004 Digital financial asset 1 transaction kiosks. 2 1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context 3 otherwise requires: 4 a. âChargesâ means any of the following: 5 (1) A fee or expense paid by a consumer. 6 (2) The difference between the current market price of a 7 digital financial asset on a licensed digital financial asset 8 exchange and the price of the digital financial asset charged 9 to a consumer. 10 b. âDigital financial assetâ means a virtual representation 11 of value or rights that can be transferred, stored, or traded 12 electronically and used for payment or investment purposes. 13 c. âDigital financial asset transaction kioskâ means an 14 electronic information processing device that is capable of 15 accepting or dispensing United States coin and paper currency 16 in exchange for a digital financial asset. 17 d. âLicensed digital financial asset exchangeâ means a 18 digital financial asset exchange that is not an operator and 19 that has a license under section 533C.301 to engage in the 20 business of money transmission in this state. 21 e. âOperatorâ means a person who owns, operates, or manages 22 a digital financial asset transaction kiosk in this state. 23 2. Daily transactions. An operator shall not, via a digital 24 financial asset transaction kiosk, accept from a consumer or 25 dispense to a consumer more than one thousand dollars per 26 calendar day. 27 3. Maximum charges. An operator shall not directly or 28 indirectly collect charges related to a digital financial asset 29 transaction from a consumer that exceed the greater of the 30 following: 31 a. Five dollars. 32 b. Fifteen percent of the United States currency equivalent 33 of the digital financial assets involved in the digital 34 financial asset transaction according to the public quoted 35 -1- LSB 1729XC (4) 91 nls/ko 1/ 4 S.F. _____ market price of the digital financial asset on a licensed 1 digital financial asset exchange at the date and time the 2 consumer initiates the digital financial asset transaction. 3 4. Required disclosure. 4 a. Prior to a digital financial asset transaction, the 5 operator shall provide a written disclosure to the consumer in 6 English, and in the primary language used by the operator to 7 advertise, solicit, or negotiate with the consumer, containing 8 the terms and conditions of the digital financial asset 9 transaction, including, at a minimum, all of the following: 10 (1) The dollar amount, in United States currency 11 equivalent, of the digital financial asset involved in the 12 transaction. 13 (2) Any charges to be collected by the operator. 14 (3) If an operator fails to provide a process to reverse or 15 refund a digital financial asset transaction, a warning that 16 all digital financial asset transactions are final. 17 b. A disclosure required under paragraph âaâ shall be 18 clear and conspicuous and provided separately from any other 19 disclosures or information provided by the operator. 20 5. Required receipt. For any digital financial asset 21 transaction made at an operatorâs digital financial asset 22 transaction kiosk, the operator shall provide the consumer with 23 a receipt that includes all of the following information: 24 a. The name of the consumer. 25 b. The date and time of the digital financial asset 26 transaction. 27 c. The legal name of the operator. 28 d. The dollar amount of the digital financial asset involved 29 in the transaction. 30 e. (1) The dollar amount of all charges collected by 31 the operator in relation to the digital financial asset 32 transaction. 33 (2) The legal name of the licensed digital financial asset 34 exchange the operator used to calculate the charges described 35 -2- LSB 1729XC (4) 91 nls/ko 2/ 4 S.F. _____ in subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2). 1 6. Required report. An operator shall provide a list to 2 the division of banking of the street address locations of all 3 digital financial asset transaction kiosks that the operator 4 owns, operates, or manages in this state. An operator shall 5 provide the division with updates to the list within thirty 6 calendar days of any change to the list. The division shall 7 make each operatorâs list available to the public via the 8 divisionâs internet site. 9 7. Operator duties. If an operator does not engage in 10 digital financial asset transactions, but facilitates or 11 permits another person to engage in digital financial asset 12 transactions via the operatorâs digital financial asset 13 transaction kiosk, the operator shall do all of the following: 14 a. Ensure that the person engaging in digital financial 15 asset transactions has a license to engage in the business of 16 money transmission under section 533C.301. 17 b. Ensure that charges collected from a consumer via the 18 digital financial asset transaction kiosk comply with this 19 section. 20 c. Ensure that the person complies with this section. 21